Utah statutes.
10-8-89.   Damage to abutting property -- Liability of city.
Whenever by the grading of any street, alley or other public ground in a city,
pursuant to the action of the city authorities in changing the established
grade of such street, alley or public ground, after valuable improvements have
been made upon real property abutting thereon such real property is injured or
diminished in value, the owner of such real property or improvements may
recover from such city the amount of such damages or diminution in value in a
civil action brought for that purpose.
